Montana, session 2025, HB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Prohibition against enforcement of or reliance on requirements or mandates issued
by certain intergovernmental entities. (1) The world health organization, the united nations, and the world
economic forum have no jurisdiction in this state. The state and its political subdivisions, including but not
limited to any county, city, municipal corporation, consolidated city-county, school district, special improvement
or taxing district, or other political subdivision or public corporation, or any entity created by agreement between
two or more political subdivisions, may not be compelled to engage in the enforcement of, or any collaboration
with the enforcement of, any requirements or mandates issued by the world health organization, the united
nations, or the world economic forum.
(2) The state and its political subdivisions may not expend public funds or allocate public resources
for the enforcement of any requirement or mandates issued by the world health organization, the united
nations, or the world economic forum.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as a new part of Title 2,
chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are severable from the
invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in
effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 350
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 350
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 350
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 350, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 350
INTRODUCED BY J. HINKLE, L. SCHUBERT, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, M. VINTON, S. KLAKKEN, G.
OVERSTREET, T. SHARP, E. BYRNE, L. BENNETT, C. SCHOMER, C. COCHRAN, M. THIEL, T. MILLETT,
T. MANZELLA, D. ZOLNIKOV, D. EMRICH, J. FULLER, C. HINKLE, L. JONES, G. LAMMERS, M. REGIER, S.
FITZPATRICK, C. GLIMM, R. MINER, J. SCHILLINGER, G. OBLANDER, J. ETCHART, L. DEMING, F. NAVE,
J. GILLETTE, L. BREWSTER, T. FALK, P. FIELDER, G. HERTZ, G. KMETZ, F. MANDEVILLE, B. MERCER,
B. MITCHELL, M. NOLAND, G. PARRY, J. TREBAS, Z. WIRTH, K. BOGNER, B. PHALEN
AN ACT PROHIBITING THE ENFORCEMENT OF POLICIES ISSUED BY CERTAIN INTERGOVERNMENTAL
ENTITIES IN THE STATE; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”